test/src/gt-norm-yamls/old-yamls/N-AN-kihci-okiniy_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Noun - kihci-okiniy - ok : # -m animate noun, tomato, Wolvengrey
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg: kihci-okiniy
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Sg: nikihci-okinîm
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Sg: kikihci-okinîm
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Sg+Obv: okihci-okinîma
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Sg+Obv: okihci-okinîmiyiwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px1Pl: nikihci-okinîminân
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px12Pl: kikihci-okinîminaw
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px2Pl: kikihci-okinîmiwâw
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px3Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîmiwâwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Px4Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîmiyiwa
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl: kihci-okiniyak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Sg: nikihci-okinîmak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Sg: kikihci-okinîmak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Sg+Obv: okihci-okinîma
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Sg+Obv: okihci-okinîmiyiwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px1Pl: nikihci-okinîminânak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px12Pl: kikihci-okinîminawak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px2Pl: kikihci-okinîmiwâwak
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px3Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîmiwâwa
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Pl+Px4Pl+Obv: okihci-okinîmiyiwa
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Sg+Obv: kihci-okiniya
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Loc: kihci-okinîhk
     
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Sg: [kihci-okinîs, kihci-okinîsis]
     kihci-okiniy+N+AN+Der/Dim+N+AN+Pl: [kihci-okinîsak, kihci-okinîsisak]
